Maryland, session 2026, SB1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
15–109.
(a) (1) (I) The Commission shall appoint an executive director[,] AND a
secretary–treasurer[, and a general counsel].
[(2)] (II) The executive director[,] AND secretary–treasurer[, and general
counsel] serve at the pleasure of the Commission.
[(3)] (III) The Commission shall set the compensation of the executive
director[,] AND secretary–treasurer[, and general counsel].
[(b)] (2) The executive director and the secretary–treasurer shall be bonded.
[(c)] (3) [Of the three] THE officers appointed under this [section, not more
than two shall] SUBSECTION MAY NOT be residents of the same county.
(B) (1) (I) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY PLANNING BOARD SHALL
APPOINT LEGAL COUNSEL FOR COMMISSION OPERATIONS CONDUCTED PRIMARILY
IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(II) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY PLANNING BOARD SHALL
APPOINT LEGAL COUNSEL FOR COMMISSION OPERATIONS CONDUCTED PRIMARILY
IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(2) LEGAL COUNSEL APPOINTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SERVE AT
THE PLEASURE OF THE APPOINTING COUNTY PLANNING BOARD.
(3) EACH COUNTY PLANNING BOARD SHALL SET THE COMPENSATION
OF THE RESPECTIVE LEGAL COUNSEL.
(4) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY DESIGNATE LEGAL COUNSEL
APPOINTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FROM ONE COUNTY FOR MATTERS REQUIRING
REPRESENTATION OR ACTION FROM THE COMMISSION AS A SINGLE CORPORATE
BODY.
(II) A DESIGNATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH DOES NOT LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF EITHER COUNTY PLANNING
BOARD TO DIRECT EACH RESPECTIVE LEGAL COUNSEL.

SENATE BILL 1005 3
15–110.
(A) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
Commission may:
(1) appoint or contract for the services of planning, engineering, legal,
administrative, auditing, clerical, staff, or other employees necessary to administer this
division on a regional basis; and
(2) set the compensation of employees and contractors.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS DIVISION, THE
MONTGOMERY COUNTY PLANNING BOARD AND THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
PLANNING BOARD EACH SHALL EXERCISE DIRECT AUTHORITY OVER:
(1) HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATION FOR COMMISSION
EMPLOYEES PRIMARILY ASSIGNED TO EACH RESPECTIVE COUNTY; AND
(2) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS AND SERVICES USED
PRIMARILY FOR COMMISSION OPERATIONS IN EACH RESPECTIVE COUNTY.
15–110.1.
(A) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY PLANNING BOARD AND THE PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY PLANNING BOARD SHALL EACH DIRECT AND CONTROL
ADMINISTRATIVE FUNCTIONS FOR COMMISSION OPERATIONS WITHIN EACH
RESPECTIVE COUNTY FOR:
(1) HUMAN RESOURCES;
(2) INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY; AND
(3) LEGAL SERVICES.
(B) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION LIMITS THE AUTHORITY OF THE
COMMISSION TO ACT AS A SINGLE CORPORATE BODY WHEN REQUIRED BY LAW.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY PLANNING
BOARD AND THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY PLANNING BOARD, THE COMMISSION
MAY USE SHARED ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES.
15–506.

SENATE BILL 1005
(a) The Commission shall include in the Commission’s annual operating budget
proposal the amounts recommended by the Audit Committee for the Office.
(b) Subject to budget authorization and adequate funds:
(1) [the Commission’s general] LEGAL counsel APPOINTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–109(B) OF THIS TITLE shall provide legal services to the
Inspector General and may employ special counsel if appropriate or required by law; and
(2) the Inspector General may employ and be represented by a special legal
counsel without consent of the [general] LEGAL counsel APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 15–109(B) OF THIS TITLE if the Audit Committee approves of a request after
considering any recommendation or comment offered by the [general] LEGAL counsel
relating to the request.
16–102.
(a) The Commission shall implement a merit system adopted under this subtitle.
(b) The merit system includes each employee of the Commission, except:
(1) the commissioners;
(2) the executive director, secretary–treasurer, and [general] LEGAL
counsel appointed [by the Commission] under [§ 15–109] § 15–109(B) of this article;
(3) (i) the Inspector General; and
(ii) any temporary term employee of the Office of the Inspector
General appointed under § 15–503 of this article;
(4) a part–time or temporary employee under Subtitle 2 or Subtitle 5 of this
title;
(5) in Montgomery County, each position excluded under § 20–204(b) of
this article; and
(6) in Prince George’s County:
(i) the deputy chief of park police as provided in § 17–305 of this
article; and
(ii) each director and deputy director as provided in § 20–204(c) of
this article.
16–103.

SENATE BILL 1005 5
(a) There is a merit system board of the Commission.
(c) (1) Each member of the board:
(i) shall be a resident of the regional district;
(ii) shall be knowledgeable and experienced in personnel matters;
and
(iii) may not be a member or employee of the Commission or the
executive director, secretary–treasurer, or [general] LEGAL counsel appointed [by the
Commission] under [§ 15–109] § 15–109(B) of this article.
(2) Not more than two members of the board may reside in the same
county.
16–201.
(a) (2) The rights granted to Commission merit system employees under this
subtitle do not apply to:
(i) attorneys [in the General Counsel’s office] SERVING UNDER
LEGAL COUNSEL APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–109(B) OF THIS ARTICLE;
(ii) confidential employees;
(iii) employees who are at grade J or above;
(iv) park police officers;
(v) 1. the Inspector General; and
2. any subordinate employee of the Office of the Inspector
General appointed under § 15–503 of this article;
(vi) probationary employees; or
(vii) supervisors, as defined in § 2(11) of the National Labor Relations
Act, 29 U.S.C. § 152(11).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.